Connecticut, session 2026, HB05187.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to (1) adjust the methodology
used to calculate the annual adjustment to the threshold amount of the
revenue transfer under section 4-30a of the general statutes, to use an
LCO No. 947 1 of 2

Proposed Bill No. 5187
inflation-adjusted five-year moving average of the revenue being
transferred, and (2) increase the maximum capacity of the Budget
Reserve Fund to twenty per cent of net General Fund appropriations.